Hawaii statutes.
[§6K-3] Reservation of uses.
(a) The Kaho‘olawe island reserve shall be used solely and exclusively for the
following purposes:

(1) Preservation and practice of all rights
customarily and traditionally exercised by native Hawaiians for cultural, spiritual,
and subsistence purposes;

(2) Preservation and protection of its
archaeological, historical, and environmental resources;

(3) Rehabilitation, revegetation, habitat
restoration, and preservation; and

(4) Education.

(b) The island shall be reserved in perpetuity
for the uses enumerated in subsection (a). Commercial uses shall be strictly
prohibited. [L 1993, c 340, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next